Utah statutes.
78B-6-308.   Procedure when party charged fails to appear.

When the warrant of arrest has been served, if the person arrested does not appear on the specified day, the court or judge may issue another warrant of arrest, or may order the undertaking to be prosecuted or both. If the undertaking is prosecuted, the measure of damages in the action is the extent of the loss or injury sustained by the aggrieved party by reason of the misconduct for which the warrant was issued, and the costs of the proceeding.

